Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-1449
Transactions entered into before effective date; effect.

Transactions entered into before July 12, 1974, and not extended or renewed after that date, and the rights, duties, and interests flowing from them remain valid and may be terminated, completed, consummated, or enforced as required or permitted prior to July 12, 1974.

Laws 1974, LB 293, § 50.